Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-493
Class I or Class II school district; new district officers; acceptance of office.

Within ten days after their election, the officers of a new Class I or Class II school district as referred to in section 79-492 shall file with the secretary a written acceptance of the offices to which they have been elected, which acceptance shall be recorded by the secretary. The office of any such officer who fails to file such acceptance within the time specified in this section shall become vacant at the expiration of such period and shall be filled by the remaining members of the board.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision III, § 3, p. 343;

R.S.1913, § 6754;

C.S.1922, § 6295;

C.S.1929, § 79-303;

R.S.1943, § 79-303;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 194, p. 754;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-510;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 242;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 57;

Referendum 2006, No. 422.

Under former law, failure of moderator to file acceptance did not forfeit title to office if he had performed duties for one year without objection. Frans v. Young, 30 Neb. 360, 46 N.W. 528 (1890).